Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6244.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-17-19.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-17 entitled "Licensing
of Healthcare Facilities" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-17-19.1. Rights of patients.
Every healthcare facility licensed under this chapter shall observe the following standards
and any other standards that may be prescribed in rules and regulations promulgated by the
licensing agency with respect to each patient who utilizes the facility:
(1) The patient shall be afforded considerate and respectful care.
(2) Upon request, the patient shall be furnished with the name of the physician responsible
for coordinating the patient's care.
(3) Upon request, the patient shall be furnished with the name of the physician or other
person responsible for conducting any specific test or other medical procedure performed by the
healthcare facility in connection with the patient’s treatment.
(4) The patient shall have the right to refuse any treatment by the healthcare facility to the
extent permitted by law.
(5) The patient’s right to privacy shall be respected to the extent consistent with providing
adequate medical care to the patient and with the efficient administration of the healthcare facility.
Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude discreet discussion of a patient’s case or
examination by appropriate medical personnel.
(6) The patient’s right to privacy and confidentiality shall extend to all records pertaining

to the patient’s treatment except as otherwise provided by law.
(7) The healthcare facility shall respond in a reasonable manner to the request of a patient’s
physician, certified nurse practitioner, and/or a physician’s assistant for medical services to the
patient. The healthcare facility shall also respond in a reasonable manner to the patient’s request
for other services customarily rendered by the healthcare facility to the extent the services do not
require the approval of the patient’s physician, certified nurse practitioner, and/or a physician’s
assistant or are not inconsistent with the patient’s treatment.
(8) Before transferring a patient to another facility, the healthcare facility must first inform
the patient of the need for, and alternatives to, a transfer.
(9) Upon request, the patient shall be furnished with the identities of all other healthcare
and educational institutions that the healthcare facility has authorized to participate in the patient’s
treatment and the nature of the relationship between the institutions and the healthcare facility.
(10)(i) Except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph, if the healthcare facility
proposes to use the patient in any human-subjects research, it shall first thoroughly inform the
patient of the proposal and offer the patient the right to refuse to participate in the project.
(ii) No facility shall be required to inform prospectively the patient of the proposal and the
patient’s right to refuse to participate when an institutional review board approves the human-
subjects research pursuant to the patient consent and/or de-identification requirements of 21 C.F.R.
Pt. 50 and/or 45 C.F.R. Pt. 46 (relating to the informed consent of human subjects).
(11) Upon request, the patient shall be allowed to examine and shall be given an
explanation of the bill rendered by the healthcare facility irrespective of the source of payment of
the bill.
(12) Upon request, the patient shall be permitted to examine any pertinent healthcare
facility rules and regulations that specifically govern the patient’s treatment.
(13) The patient shall not be denied appropriate care on the basis of age, sex, gender identity
or expression, sexual orientation, race, color, marital status, familial status, disability, religion,
national origin, source of income, source of payment, or profession.
(14) Patients shall be provided with a summarized medical bill within thirty (30) days of
discharge from a healthcare facility. Upon request, the patient shall be furnished with an itemized
copy of the patient’s bill. When patients are residents of state-operated institutions and facilities,
the provisions of this subsection shall not apply.
(15) Upon request, the patient shall be allowed the use of a personal television set provided
that the television complies with underwriters’ laboratory standards and O.S.H.A. standards, and
so long as the television set is classified as a portable television.
LC002749/SUB A - Page 2 of 4

(16) No charge of any kind, including, but not limited to, copying, postage, retrieval, or
processing fees, shall be made for furnishing a health record or part of a health record to a patient,
the patient’s attorney, or authorized representative if the record, or part of the record, is necessary
for the purpose of supporting an appeal under any provision of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C.
§ 301 et seq., and the request is accompanied by documentation of the appeal or a claim under the
provisions of the Workers’ Compensation Act, chapters 29 — 38 of title 28, or for any patient who
is a veteran and the medical record is necessary for any application for benefits of any kind. A
provider shall furnish a health record requested pursuant to this section by mail, electronically, or
otherwise, within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the request. For the purposes of this section,
“provider” shall include any out-of-state entity that handles medical records for in-state providers.
Further, for patients of school-based health centers, the director is authorized to specify by
regulation an alternative list of age appropriate rights commensurate with this section.
(17) The patient shall have the right to have his or her pain assessed on a regular basis.
(18) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, upon request, patients receiving
care through hospitals, nursing homes, assisted-living residences and home healthcare providers,
shall have the right to receive information concerning hospice care, including the benefits of
hospice care, the cost, and how to enroll in hospice care.
(19) The patient shall not be asked about their immigration status or asked to present proof
of their legal presence in the United States.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002749/SUB A
========
LC002749/SUB A - Page 3 of 4